langs/6/morphology.twol
Alphabet
 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z
 a:a b c d e:e f g h i:i j k l m n o:o p q r:r s t u v w x y z
 %{pst%}:0
 %{prs%}:0
 %{fut%}:0
 %{1%}:0
 %{2%}:0
 %{3%}:0
 %{sg%}:0
 %{pl%}:0 
 %{ie%}:0
 %{V%!o%}:0
 %{Vae%}:0
 %{V%}:0
 %{Vie%}:0
 %{Va%}:a
 %{Ve%}:e
 %{Vi%}:e ;

Sets

PreRVow = a e i ;
P2or3 = %{2%} %{3%} ;
Person = %{1%} %{2%} %{3%} ;
RootVow = %{Va%} %{Ve%} %{Vi%} ;

Rules

"No root vowel (a) in 1S"
%{Va%}:0 <=> _ o ;
"No root vowel (e) in 1S"
%{Ve%}:0 <=> _ o ;
"No root vowel (i) in 1S"
%{Vi%}:0 <=> _ o ;

"ir -> er"
i:e <=> _ r: %{Vae%}: ;
"drop r before %{Vae%}"
r:0 <=> _ %{Vae%}: ;
"delete o when prs paradigm is copied to other tenses"
o:0 <=> %{V%!o%}: _ ;
"1S v"
PreRVow:0 <=> _ r: %{V%}: ;
"1S r"
r:0 <=> _ %{V%}: ;
